Utah statutes.
10-3-1008.   Appointments from civil service list -- Probation period.

In all cases the appointing power shall notify the civil service commission of each separate position to be filled, and shall fill such place by the appointment of one of the persons certified by the commission therefor. Such appointment shall be on probation, and of a character and for a period to be prescribed by the civil service commission.



Enacted by Chapter 48, 1977 General Session

